Washington statutes.
RCW 36.65.020

School districts to be retained as separate political subdivisions.

Recognizing the paramount duty of the state to provide for the common schools under Article IX, sections 1 and 2 of the state Constitution, school districts shall be retained as separate political subdivisions within the city-county.

[ 1984 c 91 s 2.]